trunk/apertium-es-ssp/apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/emegroper__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>  
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emomugropor</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>emomugropor</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>emomugropor</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emomugropor</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ñm.emigropir</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ñm.emigropir</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emegroper</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylegropeyr</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylegropeyr</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylegropeyr</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylegropeyr</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eilegropeir</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eilegropeir</l> 
        <r>emegroper<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="/ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ubòamemuwa</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>ubòamemuwa</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmimuhe:ômamacb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmimuhe:ômamacb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylahsòmìmuhe:ômàmacb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylahsòmìmuhe:ômàmacb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucby</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ubòamemuwa</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ubòamemuwa</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucby</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylahsòmémuho:ômàmucby</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylahsòmémuho:ômàmucby</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ilahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ilahsòmémuho:ômàmucby</l> 
        <r>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb"><par n="/ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="emegroper"><par n="/emegroper__vblex"/></e>
